Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.156

Fees—Adoption by rule.

The fees authorized under RCW 43.330.150, 43.330.152, * 70.95H.040, and ** 43.210.110 shall be adopted by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1994 c 284 s 8.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The governor vetoed 1994 c 284 s 5, the amendment to RCW 70.95H.040 that provided for fees. Chapter 70.95H RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 9.

**(2) RCW 43.210.110 was repealed by 1991 c 314 s 18, effective June 30, 1997.

Effective date—1994 c 284: See RCW 43.22A.901.